District of Columbia statutes.
4-205.42

Definitions relating to incapacity and disability.

For the purpose of determining coverage and conditions of eligibility of applicants and recipients in financial and medical assistance programs of the District, the Mayor shall apply the following definitions relating to incapacity and disability with respect to parents and other adults who are otherwise eligible for assistance under such programs:

(1)

Physical or mental incapacity. —

(A)

For the TANF program, physical or mental incapacity shall be deemed to exist when 1 parent has a physical or mental defect, illness, or impairment. The incapacity shall be supported by competent medical testimony and must be of such a debilitating nature as to reduce substantially or eliminate the parent’s ability to support or care for an otherwise eligible child and be expected to last for a period of at least 30 days.

(B)

Repealed.

(C)

In making the determination of ability to support, the Mayor shall take into account the limited employment opportunities of individuals with disabilities.

(D)

A finding of eligibility for OASDI or SSI benefits, based on disability or blindness, shall be deemed acceptable proof of incapacity for purposes of the TANF program.

(2)

Repealed.

Apr. 6, 1982, D.C. Law 4-101, § 542, 29 DCR 1060
Aug. 17, 1991, D.C. Law 9-27, § 2(e), 38 DCR 4205
Mar. 20, 1998, D.C. Law 12-60, § 701(l), 44 DCR 7378
Apr. 20, 1999, D.C. Law 12-241, § 2(jj), 46 DCR 905
Apr. 24, 2007, D.C. Law 16-305, § 13(c), 53 DCR 6198
1981 Ed., § 3-205.42.
D.C. Law 16-305, in par. (1)(C), substituted “individuals with disabilities” for “handicapped individuals”.
For temporary (225 day) amendment of section, see § 101(e) of Omnibus Budget Support Temporary Act of 1991 (D.C. Law 9-19, June 21, 1991, law notification 38 DCR 5786).
For temporary (225 day) amendment of section, see § 2(x) of Public Assistance Temporary Amendment Act of 1997 (D.C. Law 12-7, August 1, 1997, law notification 44 DCR 4639).
For temporary (225 day) amendment of section, see § 2(l) of General Public Assistance Program Termination Temporary Amendment Act of 1997 (D.C. Law 12-21, September 23, 1997, law notification 44 DCR 5760).
For temporary (225 day) amendment of section, see § 701(l) of Fiscal Year 1998 Revised Budget Support Temporary Act of 1997 (D.C. Law 12-59, March 20, 1998, law notification 45 DCR 2094).
For temporary (225 day) amendment of section, see § 2(x) of Public Assistance Temporary Amendment Act of 1998 (D.C. Law 12-130, July 24, 1998, law notification 45 DCR 6501).
For temporary (225 day) amendment of section, see § 2(jj) of Self-Sufficiency Promotion Temporary Amendment Act of 1998 (D.C. Law 12-230, April 20, 1999, law notification 46 DCR 4143).
For temporary amendment of section, see § 101(e) of the Omnibus Budget Support Emergency Act of 1991 (D.C. Act 9-37, May 17, 1991, 38 DCR 3390).
For temporary amendment of section, see § 101(e) of the Omnibus Budget Support Congressional Recess Emergency Act of 1991 (D.C. Act 9-69, July 24, 1991, 38 DCR 4945).
For temporary amendment of section, see § 2(x) of the Public Assistance Emergency Amendment Act of 1997 (D.C. Act 12-25, February 27, 1997, 44 DCR 1778), § 2(x) of the Public Assistance Legislative Review Emergency Amendment Act of 1997 (D.C. Act 12-77, May 27, 1997, 44 DCR 3181), and § 2(x) of the Public Assistance Emergency Amendment Act of 1998 (D.C. Act 12-306, March 20, 1998, 45 DCR 1900).
For temporary amendment of section, see § 2(l) of the General Public Assistance Program Termination Emergency Amendment Act of 1997 (D.C. Act 12-72, May 12, 1997, 44 DCR 2989).
For temporary amendment of section, see § 701(l) of the Fiscal Year 1998 Revised Budget Support Emergency Act of 1997 (D.C. Act 12-152, October 17, 1997, 44 DCR 6196), and see § 701(l) of the Fiscal Year 1998 Revised Budget Support Congressional Review Emergency Act of 1997 (D.C. Act 12-239, January 13, 1998, 45 DCR 508).
For temporary amendment of section, see § 2(jj) of the Self-Sufficiency Promotion Emergency Amendment Act of 1998 (D.C. Act 12-372, June 9, 1998, 45 DCR 4270), § 2(jj) of the Self-Sufficiency Promotion Legislative Review Emergency Amendment Act of 1998 (D.C. Act 12-425, July 31, 1998, 45 DCR 5682), § 2(jj) of the Self-Sufficiency Promotion Congressional Review Emergency Amendment Act of 1998 (D.C. Act 12-552, December 24, 1998, 46 DCR 521), and § 2(jj) of the Self-Sufficiency Promotion Congressional Review Emergency Amendment Act of 1999 (D.C. Act 13-19, February 17, 1999, 46 DCR 2492).
Application of Law 12-60: Section 2002 of D.C. Law 12-60 provided that the act shall apply as of October 1, 1997.